Massachusetts, session 194th, HD4692.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Paragraph (a) of subdivision (2) of section 5 of chapter 32 of the General Laws is hereby
amended by adding the following paragraph:-
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, any member, who was not an
active member on April 2, 2012 and who has served in more than 1 group may elect to receive a
retirement allowance consisting of pro-rated benefits based upon the percentage of total years of
service that the member rendered in each group. The pro-rated benefits shall be calculated in a
manner prescribed by the commission.
of 1